Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-905
Political subdivision; building; use as polling place or for election training purposes; when.

A political subdivision which receives federal or state funds and owns or leases a building which is suitable for a polling place in the county shall make the building available to the election commissioner or county clerk for use as a polling place or for election training purposes. The political subdivision shall not charge for the use of the building as a polling place or for election training purposes.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 248;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 28.